Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 423.105, as amended by section 8, chapter 120, Oregon Laws  2018, is amended
to read:
423.105. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Collected moneys” means moneys that have been collected  from an inmate trust account
by the Department of Corrections pursuant to this section.
(b) “Court-ordered financial obligation” means:
(A) A  compensatory fine imposed pursuant to ORS 137.101, an award of restitution as defined
in ORS 137.103 or any other fines, fees or court-appointed attorney fees imposed in a criminal action;
(B) A child support obligation;
(C) A  civil judgment including a money award [ for a crime victim entered against an inmate re-
sulting from a crime committed by the inmate ] in which the Department of Justice is a  judgment
creditor; or
(D) A civil judgment including a money award  entered against an inmate resulting from an
action  for  the inmate’s assault or battery of a Department of Corrections or Oregon Corrections
Enterprises employee.
(c) “Criminal action” has the meaning given that term in ORS 131.005.
[(c)] (d) “Eligible moneys” means moneys deposited in an inmate trust account  that are subject
to collection under this section,  including but not limited to inmate performance monetary awards
and moneys received  from an inmate’s family members or friends. “Eligible moneys” does not include
protected moneys.
[(d)] (e)  “Inmate” means a person who is at least  18 years of age and in the physical custody
of the Department of Corrections. “Inmate” does not include:
(A) A  person on leave from prison due to participation in an alternative incarceration program
established under ORS 421.504 or short-term transitional leave under ORS 421.168.
(B) A person transferred into or out of  department custody pursuant to an interstate corrections
compact.
(C) A person in the physical custody of the Oregon Youth Authority.
(D) A person in the physical custody of a county jail or other county detention facility.
[(e)] (f)  “Protected moneys” means moneys  deposited in an inmate trust account that are not
subject to collection under state or federal law or under this section including but not limited to:
(A) Disability benefits for veterans;
(B) Moneys received from a Native American tribe or tribal government;
Enrolled Senate Bill 980 (SB 980-B) Page 1
(C) Moneys dedicated for medical, dental or optical expenses or emergency trips;
(D) Railroad retirement benefits; or
(E) Moneys paid as compensation to an inmate in a prison work program established under the
Prison Industries Enhancement Certification Program, or a successor program designated by the
United States Director of the Bureau of Justice Assistance pursuant to 18 U.S.C. 1761.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 161.675, the Department of Corrections  shall collect eligible mon-
eys from an inmate trust account if the inmate owes court-ordered financial  obligations as described
in this section.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the department may deduct a fixed
percentage of each inmate  performance monetary award made to an inmate, to be credited to a
general victims assistance fund, before crediting the  remainder of the award to the inmate trust
account.
(3)(a) The [ Department of Justice and the ] Judicial Department shall provide an accounting to the
Department of Corrections of court-ordered financial obligations  described in subsection  (1)(b)(A)
of this section , if any, owed by each inmate. The accounting records may be  provided electron-
ically in a format agreed upon by the departments.
(b) Upon receipt of  the accounting records described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the
Department of Corrections shall collect a portion of  eligible moneys from the inmate trust account
of each inmate as follows:
(A) Until an inmate not sentenced to death or to  life imprisonment without the possibility of
release or parole has $500 in a  transitional fund to facilitate reentry after release, 10 percent of
eligible moneys shall be collected for court-ordered financial obligations and  five percent of eligible
moneys shall be collected and transferred to the inmate’s transitional fund.
(B) After the inmate has at least $500 in the transitional fund, or if  the inmate has been sen-
tenced to death or to life imprisonment without the possibility of release or  parole, the department
shall collect 15 percent of eligible moneys for court-ordered financial obligations.
(C) After court-ordered  financial obligations have been paid, an inmate not sentenced to death
or to  life imprisonment without the possibility of release or parole may elect to continue to transfer
five percent of eligible moneys into the transitional fund.
(c) Notwithstanding  ORS 18.615 or any other provision of law, while moneys held in an inmate’s
transitional fund described in this subsection remain within the custody or control of the  Depart-
ment of Corrections, those moneys are neither assignable nor subject to  execution, garnishment,
attachment or any other process.
(4) There are [ three] four  levels of priority  for the application of collected moneys to court-
ordered financial obligations, with Level I obligations having the highest priority and Level  [ III ]
IV obligations having the lowest priority. The levels are as follows:
(a) Level I obligations are compensatory fines imposed pursuant to ORS  137.101, awards of
restitution defined in ORS 137.103 and fines, fees  or court-appointed attorney fees imposed in a
criminal action.
(b) Level II obligations are civil judgments that include a money award in which the De-
partment of Justice is a judgment creditor.
[(b)] (c)  Level [ II] III  obligations are child  support obligations [ and civil judgments including a
money award for a crime victim entered  against an inmate resulting from a crime committed by the
inmate].
[(c)] (d) Level [ III ] IV  obligations are civil judgments including a money  award entered against
an inmate resulting from an action for the inmate’s assault or  battery of a Department of Cor-
rections or Oregon Corrections Enterprises employee.
(5)(a) After receiving  the accounting records described in subsection (3) of this section, the De-
partment of Corrections shall disburse the collected moneys for  court-ordered financial obligations
to the Department of Justice and the Judicial Department , as appropriate .
Enrolled Senate Bill 980 (SB 980-B) Page 2
(b) The Department of Justice  and the Judicial Department shall apply the collected moneys
received from the  Department of Corrections under this subsection to an inmate’s court-ordered fi-
nancial obligations according to the priority levels of the obligations.
(6)(a) The Department of Justice may create a subaccount in which to deposit the collected
moneys received from the Department of Corrections under this section.
(b) The Judicial Department may create a subaccount in which to deposit the collected moneys
received from the Department of Corrections under this section.
(c) The Department of Corrections  may create subaccounts for the purposes of storing collected
moneys prior to disbursement under this section.
(7) The Department of Corrections, the Department  of Justice and the Judicial Department may
adopt rules to implement this section.
SECTION 2.  ORS 423.105, as amended by section  8, chapter 120, Oregon Laws 2018, and section
1 of this 2019 Act, is amended to read:
423.105. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Collected moneys” means moneys that  have been collected from an inmate trust account
by the Department of Corrections pursuant to this section.
(b) “Court-ordered financial obligation” means:
(A) A compensatory fine imposed pursuant to ORS 137.101, an award of restitution as  defined
in ORS 137.103 or any other fines, fees or court-appointed attorney fees imposed in a criminal action;
(B) A child support obligation;
(C) A civil judgment including a money award in which the Department of Justice  is a judgment
creditor; or
(D) A civil judgment including a money award  entered against an inmate resulting from an
action  for  the inmate’s assault or battery of a Department of Corrections or Oregon Corrections
Enterprises employee.
(c) “Criminal action” has the meaning given that term in ORS 131.005.
(d) “Eligible moneys” means moneys deposited in an inmate trust  account that are subject to
collection under this section, including but not limited  to inmate performance monetary awards and
moneys received from an inmate’s family members or friends. “Eligible moneys” does  not include
protected  moneys.
(e) “Inmate” means a person who is at least 18 years of age and in the  physical custody of the
Department of Corrections. “Inmate” does not include:
(A) A  person on leave from prison due to participation in an alternative incarceration program
established under ORS 421.504 or short-term transitional leave under ORS 421.168.
(B) A person transferred into or out of  department custody pursuant to an interstate corrections
compact.
(C) A person in the physical custody of the Oregon Youth Authority.
(D) A person in the physical custody of a county jail or other county detention facility.
(f) “Protected moneys” means moneys deposited in an inmate  trust account that are not subject
to collection under state or federal law or under this section including but not limited to:
(A) Disability benefits for veterans;
(B) Moneys received from a Native American tribe or tribal government;
(C) Moneys dedicated for medical, dental or optical expenses or emergency trips;
(D) Railroad retirement benefits; or
(E) Moneys paid as compensation to an inmate in a prison work program established under the
Prison Industries Enhancement Certification Program, or a successor program designated by the
United States Director of the Bureau of Justice Assistance pursuant to 18 U.S.C. 1761.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 161.675, the  Department of Corrections shall collect eligible moneys
from an inmate  trust account if the inmate owes court-ordered financial obligations as described in
this section.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the department may deduct a fixed
percentage of each inmate performance monetary award made to an inmate, to be  credited to a
Enrolled Senate Bill 980 (SB 980-B) Page 3
general victims assistance fund, before crediting the remainder of  the award to the inmate trust
account.
(3)(a) The Judicial Department shall provide an accounting to the Department of  Corrections
of court-ordered financial obligations described  in subsection (1)(b)(A) of this section, if any, owed
by each inmate. The Department of Justice shall  provide an accounting of court-ordered fi-
nancial obligations described in subsection (1)(b)(B) and (C) of this  section.  The accounting
records may be provided electronically in a format agreed upon by the departments.
(b) Upon receipt of  the accounting records described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the
Department of Corrections shall collect a portion of  eligible moneys from the inmate trust account
of each inmate as follows:
(A) Until an inmate not sentenced to death or to  life imprisonment without the possibility of
release or parole has $500 in a  transitional fund to facilitate reentry after release, 10 percent of
eligible moneys shall be collected for court-ordered financial obligations and  five percent of eligible
moneys shall be collected and transferred to the inmate’s transitional fund.
(B) After the inmate has at least $500 in the transitional fund, or if  the inmate has been sen-
tenced to death or to life imprisonment without the possibility of release or  parole, the department
shall collect 15 percent of eligible moneys for court-ordered financial obligations.
(C) After court-ordered  financial obligations have been paid, an inmate not sentenced to death
or to  life imprisonment without the possibility of release or parole may elect to continue to transfer
five percent of eligible moneys into the transitional fund.
(c) Notwithstanding  ORS 18.615 or any other provision of law, while moneys held in an inmate’s
transitional fund described in this subsection remain within the custody or control of the  Depart-
ment of Corrections, those moneys are neither assignable nor subject to  execution, garnishment,
attachment or any other process.
(4) There are four levels  of priority for the application of collected moneys to court-ordered fi-
nancial obligations, with Level I obligations having the highest priority and  Level IV obligations
having the lowest priority. The levels are as follows:
(a) Level I obligations are compensatory fines imposed pursuant to ORS  137.101, awards of
restitution defined in ORS 137.103 and fines, fees  or court-appointed attorney fees imposed in a
criminal action.
(b) Level II obligations  are civil judgments that include a money award in which the Department
of Justice is a judgment creditor.
(c) Level III obligations are child support obligations.
(d) Level IV  obligations are civil judgments including a money award entered against an inmate
resulting from an action for the inmate’s assault or battery of a Department of Corrections  or
Oregon Corrections Enterprises employee.
(5)(a) After receiving  the accounting records described in subsection (3) of this section, the De-
partment of Corrections shall disburse the collected moneys for  court-ordered financial obligations
to the Department of Justice and the Judicial Department, as appropriate.
(b) The Department of Justice  and the Judicial Department shall apply the collected moneys
received from the  Department of Corrections under this subsection to an inmate’s court-ordered fi-
nancial obligations according to the priority levels of the obligations.
(6)(a) The Department of Justice may create a subaccount in which to deposit the collected
moneys received from the Department of Corrections under this section.
(b) The Judicial Department may create a subaccount in which to deposit the collected moneys
received from the Department of Corrections under this section.
(c) The Department of Corrections  may create subaccounts for the purposes of storing collected
moneys prior to disbursement under this section.
(7) The Department of Corrections, the Department  of Justice and the Judicial Department may
adopt rules to implement this section.
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS 423.105 by  section 2 of this 2019 Act become oper-
ative July 1, 2021.
Enrolled Senate Bill 980 (SB 980-B) Page 4
SECTION 3a. If House Bill 3146 becomes law,  section 1 of this 2019 Act (amending ORS
423.105) is repealed and ORS 423.105, as amended by section 8, chapter 120, Oregon Laws 2018,
and section 99, chapter 213, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill 3146),  is amended to read:
423.105. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Adult in custody” means a person who is at least 18  years of age and in the physical cus-
tody of the Department of Corrections. “Adult in custody” does not include:
(A) A person on leave from prison due to participation in an alternative incarceration  program
established under ORS 421.504 or short-term transitional leave under ORS 421.168.
(B) A person transferred into or out of  department custody pursuant to an interstate corrections
compact.
(C) A person in the physical custody of the Oregon Youth Authority.
(D) A person in the physical custody of a county jail or other county detention facility.
(b) “Collected moneys” means moneys that have  been collected from an adult in custody trust
account by the Department of Corrections pursuant to this section.
(c) “Court-ordered financial obligation” means:
(A) A  compensatory fine imposed pursuant to ORS 137.101, an award of restitution as defined
in ORS 137.103 or any other fines, fees or court-appointed attorney fees imposed in a criminal action;
(B) A child support obligation;
(C) A civil judgment including a money award [ for a crime victim entered against an  adult in
custody resulting from a crime committed by the  adult in custody ] in which the Department of
Justice is a judgment creditor ; or
(D) A civil judgment including a money award entered against an adult in custody resulting from
an action for the assault or battery of a Department of  Corrections or Oregon Corrections Enter-
prises employee.
(d) “Criminal action” has the meaning given that term in ORS 131.005.
[(d)] (e) “Eligible moneys” means moneys deposited in  an adult in custody trust account that
are subject to collection under this section, including but not  limited to adult in custody perform-
ance monetary awards and moneys received from  family members or friends of the adult in custody.
“Eligible moneys” does not include protected moneys.
[(e)] (f) “Protected moneys” means moneys deposited in an adult in custody trust  account that
are not subject  to collection under state or federal law or under this section including but not lim-
ited to:
(A) Disability benefits for veterans;
(B) Moneys received from a Native American tribe or tribal government;
(C) Moneys dedicated for medical, dental or optical expenses or emergency trips;
(D) Railroad retirement benefits; or
(E) Moneys  paid as compensation to an adult in custody in a prison work program established
under the Prison Industries Enhancement Certification Program,  or a successor program designated
by the United States Director of the Bureau of Justice Assistance pursuant to 18 U.S.C. 1761.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 161.675, the  Department of Corrections shall collect eligible mon-
eys from an adult in  custody trust account if the adult in custody owes court-ordered financial ob-
ligations as described in this section.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the department may deduct a fixed
percentage of each adult in custody performance  monetary award made to an adult in custody, to
be credited to a general victims assistance fund, before crediting  the remainder of the award to the
adult in custody trust account.
(3)(a) The [ Department of Justice and the ] Judicial Department shall provide an accounting to the
Department of Corrections of court-ordered financial obligations described in subsection (1)(c)(A)
of this section , if any, owed by each adult in custody. The accounting records may  be provided
electronically in a format agreed upon by the departments.
Enrolled Senate Bill 980 (SB 980-B) Page 5
(b) Upon receipt of the accounting records described in paragraph (a) of  this subsection, the
Department of Corrections shall collect a portion of eligible  moneys from the adult in custody trust
account of each adult in custody as follows:
(A) Until an adult in custody not  sentenced to death or to life imprisonment without the possi-
bility of release or parole has $500 in a transitional fund  to facilitate reentry after release, 10 per-
cent of eligible moneys shall be collected for court-ordered financial obligations and five percent of
eligible moneys shall be collected and transferred to the transitional fund.
(B) After the adult in custody has at least $500 in the transitional fund, or if  the adult in cus-
tody has been sentenced to death  or to life imprisonment without the possibility of release or parole,
the department shall collect 15 percent of eligible moneys for court-ordered financial obligations.
(C) After court-ordered financial obligations  have been paid, an adult in custody not sentenced
to death or to life  imprisonment without the possibility of release or parole may elect to continue
to transfer five percent of eligible moneys into the transitional fund.
(c) Notwithstanding ORS 18.615 or any other provision of law, while moneys held in a  transi-
tional fund described in this subsection remain within the custody or control  of the Department of
Corrections, those moneys are neither assignable  nor subject to execution, garnishment, attachment
or any other process.
(4) There are [ three] four  levels of priority  for the application of collected moneys to court-
ordered financial obligations, with Level I obligations having the highest priority and Level  [ III ]
IV obligations having the lowest priority. The levels are as follows:
(a) Level I obligations are compensatory fines imposed pursuant to ORS  137.101, awards of
restitution defined in ORS 137.103 and fines, fees  or court-appointed attorney fees imposed in a
criminal action.
(b) Level II obligations are civil judgments that include a money award in which the De-
partment of Justice is a judgment creditor.
[(b)] (c) Level [ II] III obligations are child  support obligations [ and civil judgments including a
money award for a crime victim entered against an adult in custody resulting from a crime committed
by the adult in custody ].
[(c)] (d) Level [ III ] IV obligations are civil judgments including a money  award entered against
an adult in custody resulting from an action for the assault or  battery of a Department of Cor-
rections or Oregon Corrections Enterprises employee.
(5)(a) After receiving the accounting records described in subsection (3) of this section,  the De-
partment of Corrections shall  disburse the collected moneys for court-ordered financial obligations
to the Department of Justice and the Judicial Department , as appropriate .
(b) The Department of Justice and the Judicial Department shall  apply the collected moneys
received from the Department of Corrections under this subsection to the court-ordered  financial
obligations of an adult in custody according to the priority levels of the obligations.
(6)(a) The Department of Justice may create a subaccount in which to deposit the collected
moneys received from the Department of Corrections under this section.
(b) The Judicial Department may create a subaccount in which to deposit the collected moneys
received from the Department of Corrections under this section.
(c) The Department of Corrections  may create subaccounts for the purposes of storing collected
moneys prior to disbursement under this section.
(7) The Department of Corrections, the Department  of Justice and the Judicial Department may
adopt rules to implement this section.
SECTION 3b.
If House Bill 3146 becomes law,  section 2 of this 2019 Act (amending ORS
423.105) is repealed and ORS 423.105, as amended by section 8, chapter 120, Oregon Laws 2018,
section 99, chapter 213, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill 3146),  and section 3a of this
2019 Act, is amended to read:
423.105. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Adult in custody” means a person who is at least 18  years of age and in the physical cus-
tody of the Department of Corrections. “Adult in custody” does not include:
Enrolled Senate Bill 980 (SB 980-B) Page 6
(A) A person on leave from prison due to participation in an alternative incarceration  program
established under ORS 421.504 or short-term transitional leave under ORS 421.168.
(B) A person transferred into or out of  department custody pursuant to an interstate corrections
compact.
(C) A person in the physical custody of the Oregon Youth Authority.
(D) A person in the physical custody of a county jail or other county detention facility.
(b) “Collected moneys” means moneys that have  been collected from an adult in custody trust
account by the Department of Corrections pursuant to this section.
(c) “Court-ordered financial obligation” means:
(A) A  compensatory fine imposed pursuant to ORS 137.101, an award of restitution as defined
in ORS 137.103 or any other fines, fees or court-appointed attorney fees imposed in a criminal action;
(B) A child support obligation;
(C) A civil judgment including a money award in which the Department of Justice  is a judgment
creditor; or
(D) A civil judgment including a money award entered against an adult in custody resulting from
an action for the assault or battery of a Department of  Corrections or Oregon Corrections Enter-
prises employee.
(d) “Criminal action” has the meaning given that term in ORS 131.005.
(e) “Eligible moneys” means moneys deposited  in an adult in custody trust account that are
subject to collection under this section, including but not limited to adult  in custody performance
monetary awards and moneys received from family members or friends of the adult in  custody. “El-
igible moneys” does not include protected moneys.
(f) “Protected  moneys” means moneys deposited in an adult in custody trust account that are
not subject  to collection under state or federal law or under this section including but not limited
to:
(A) Disability benefits for veterans;
(B) Moneys received from a Native American tribe or tribal government;
(C) Moneys dedicated for medical, dental or optical expenses or emergency trips;
(D) Railroad retirement benefits; or
(E) Moneys paid as compensation to an adult in custody in a prison work program  established
under the Prison Industries Enhancement Certification Program,  or a successor program designated
by the United States Director of the Bureau of Justice Assistance pursuant to 18 U.S.C. 1761.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 161.675, the  Department of Corrections shall collect eligible moneys
from an adult in custody trust account if the  adult in custody owes court-ordered financial obli-
gations as described in this section.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the department may deduct a fixed
percentage of each adult in custody performance  monetary award made to an adult in custody, to
be credited to a general victims assistance fund, before crediting  the remainder of the award to the
adult in custody trust account.
(3)(a) The Judicial Department shall provide an accounting to the Department of  Corrections
of court-ordered financial obligations  described in subsection (1)(c)(A) of this section, if any, owed
by each adult in  custody. The Department of Justice shall provide an accounting of court-
ordered financial obligations described in subsection (1)(c)(B) and (C) of this  section.  The ac-
counting records may be provided electronically in a format agreed upon by the departments.
(b) Upon receipt of  the accounting records described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the
Department of Corrections shall collect a portion of eligible  moneys from the adult in custody trust
account of each adult in custody as follows:
(A) Until an adult in custody not sentenced to death or  to life imprisonment without the possi-
bility of release or parole has $500 in  a transitional fund to facilitate reentry after release, 10 per-
cent of eligible moneys shall be collected for court-ordered financial obligations and five percent of
eligible moneys shall be collected and transferred to the transitional fund.
Enrolled Senate Bill 980 (SB 980-B) Page 7
(B) After the adult in  custody has at least $500 in the transitional fund, or if the adult in cus-
tody has been sentenced to death  or to life imprisonment without the possibility of release or parole,
the department shall collect 15 percent of eligible moneys for court-ordered financial obligations.
(C) After court-ordered financial obligations have been paid, an adult  in custody not sentenced
to death or to life imprisonment without the possibility of release or parole  may elect to continue
to transfer five percent of eligible moneys into the transitional fund.
(c) Notwithstanding  ORS 18.615 or any other provision of law, while moneys held in a transi-
tional fund described in this  subsection remain within the custody or control of the Department of
Corrections, those moneys are neither assignable  nor subject to execution, garnishment, attachment
or any other process.
(4) There are four levels of priority for the application of collected  moneys to court-ordered fi-
nancial obligations, with Level  I obligations having the highest priority and Level IV obligations
having the lowest priority. The levels are as follows:
(a) Level I obligations  are compensatory fines imposed pursuant to ORS 137.101, awards of
restitution defined in ORS 137.103 and fines, fees  or court-appointed attorney fees imposed in a
criminal action.
(b) Level II obligations  are civil judgments that include a money award in which the Department
of Justice is a judgment creditor.
(c) Level III obligations are child support obligations.
(d) Level IV obligations are civil judgments including a money award entered against  an adult
in custody resulting from an  action for the assault or battery of a Department of Corrections or
Oregon Corrections Enterprises employee.
(5)(a) After receiving  the accounting records described in subsection (3) of this section, the De-
partment of Corrections shall disburse the collected moneys for  court-ordered financial obligations
to the Department of Justice and the Judicial Department, as appropriate.
(b) The Department of Justice  and the Judicial Department shall apply the collected moneys
received  from  the Department of Corrections under this subsection to the court-ordered financial
obligations of an adult in custody according to the priority levels of the obligations.
(6)(a) The Department of Justice may create a subaccount in which to deposit the collected
moneys received from the Department of Corrections under this section.
(b) The Judicial Department may create a subaccount in which to deposit the collected moneys
received from the Department of Corrections under this section.
(c) The Department of Corrections  may create subaccounts for the purposes of storing collected
moneys prior to disbursement under this section.
(7) The Department of Corrections, the Department  of Justice and the Judicial Department may
adopt rules to implement this section.
SECTION 3c.
 If House Bill 3146 becomes law, section 3 of this 2019 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  The amendments  to ORS 423.105 by section [ 2] 3b of this 2019 Act become operative July
1, 2021.
Enrolled Senate Bill 980 (SB 980-B) Page 8
Passed by Senate April 24, 2019
Repassed by Senate June 12, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 4, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 980 (SB 980-B) Page 9